Rhode Island, session 2025, SB452.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Findings.
The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:
(1) Globally, diet-related chronic diseases are the leading cause of death;
(2) In 2024, almost forty percent (40%) of Rhode Island households with children were
food insecure;
(3) Student hunger is associated with poor learning outcomes, absenteeism, and behavioral
issues;
(4) Healthy school meals are associated with improved test scores;
(5) Many children consume one-third (1/3) to one-half (1/2) of their daily calories during
the school day;
(6) The 2012 nutrition standards for school meals (Nutrition Standards in the National
School Lunch and School Breakfast Programs, 77 Fed. Reg. 4088 [Jan. 26, 2012]) and 2016
nutrition standards for competitive foods (National School Lunch Program and School Breakfast
Program - Nutrition Standards for All Foods Sold in School as Required by the Healthy, Hunger-
Free Kids Act of 2010, 81 Feb. Reg. 50131 [July 29, 2016]) promulgated by the U.S. Department
of Agriculture were estimated to save up to seven hundred ninety-two million dollars
($792,000,000) in healthcare related costs over ten (10) years, prevent more than two million
(2,000,000) cases of childhood obesity, and reduce the risk of obesity by half among low-income
students over five (5) years;

(7) It is in the best interests of the people of the state to provide that all students have access
to a healthy and nutritious school breakfast and lunch during the school day.
SECTION 2. Chapter 16-8 of the General Laws entitled "Federal Aid [See Title 16 Chapter
97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby amended by adding thereto the
following section:
16-8-16. “Healthy school meals for all” -- School breakfast and lunch programs.
(a) The healthy school meals for all program shall be phased in over three (3) years.
Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, all public elementary schools shall be required to make
breakfasts and lunches available to elementary students attending those schools. Beginning in the
2027-2028 school year, all public elementary and secondary schools shall be required to make
breakfast and lunches available to elementary and middle school through grade eight (8) for
students attending those schools. Beginning in the 2028-2029 school year, all public elementary
and secondary schools shall be required to make breakfasts and lunches available to elementary,
middle and high school students attending those schools in accordance with rules and regulations
as set forth by the United States Department of Agriculture and adopted by the department of
elementary and secondary education pursuant to the provisions of subsection (c) of this section.
(1) Schools that participate in the School Breakfast Program authorized under § 4 of the
Child Nutrition Act of 1966 (42 U.S.C. § 1773) and National School Lunch Program authorized
under the Richard B. Russell National School Lunch Act (42 U.S.C. § 1751 et seq.) shall provide
breakfast and lunch without charge to all enrolled, attending students, every school day.
(b) In operating its school breakfast and lunch program pursuant to this section, each public
educational entity shall seek to achieve the highest level of student participation, which may include
any or all of the following:
(1) Providing breakfast meals that can be picked up by students for consumption outside
the cafeteria;
(2) Making breakfast available to students in the classroom after the start of the school day;
(3) Collaborating with the entity’s health and wellness subcommittee, as established under
§ 16-21-28, in planning school meals; and
(4) Providing lunch periods of no less than twenty (20) minutes for students to be seated
and consume their lunch.
(c) In operating its school breakfast and lunch program, each public educational entity shall
seek to maximize access to federal funds for the cost of the school breakfast and lunch program by
participating in one of the following options:
(1) National School Lunch and School Breakfast Programs, Provision 2 Guidance as
LC001591 - Page 2 of 5

promulgated by United State Department of Agriculture (USDA);
(2) The Community Eligibility Provision (hereinafter referred to in this section as "CEP")
promulgated by the USDA; or
(3) Any other federal provision that, in the opinion of the department of elementary and
secondary education, draws down the most possible federal funding for meals served in that
program, including the active dissemination and collection of meal benefit applications, as
applicable.
(d) In operating its school breakfast and lunch program, each public educational entity shall
seek to improve meal quality by:
(1) Complying with all state-specific nutrition requirements related to meals and snacks
served as part of the school day;
(2) Purchasing, to the maximum extent possible, locally grown/produced food items, as
defined by the department of elementary and secondary education;
(3) Freshly preparing scratch-cooked foods; and
(4) Providing culturally relevant meals and engaging student and family voices in menu
development.
(e) No less frequently than quarterly, each public educational entity shall report to the
department of elementary and secondary education data related to the purchasing of locally
grown/produced food items as referenced in this section and used in the operation of its school
breakfast and lunch program. Specific reporting requirements, including data points and format,
shall be determined and communicated by the department annually.
(f) The department of elementary and secondary education shall reimburse the public
educational entities described in and operating in accordance with the provisions and requirements
of this section, the difference between:
(1) The federal free reimbursement rate established annually by the United States
Department of Agriculture for school breakfast and for school lunch; and
(2) The federal reimbursement rate received for each school breakfast and school lunch
served.
(g) The department of elementary and secondary education shall adopt rules and
regulations necessary for making reimbursements pursuant to this section.
(h) For each fiscal year, the general assembly shall make an appropriation by separate line
item in the budget to allow school food authorities to provide breakfasts and lunches at no charge
for children in state-subsidized early childhood education programs administered by public
educational entities or in kindergarten through grade twelve (k-12), participating in the school lunch
LC001591 - Page 3 of 5

or breakfast program who would otherwise be required to pay for meals under these programs. The
appropriation to the department of elementary and secondary education shall be considered
entitlement dollars and shall be adjusted as necessary to meet the needs of the program on an on-
going basis, without disruption.
(i) In addition to the funding required to reimburse public educational entities as described
in this section, each fiscal year the general assembly shall make an appropriation by separate line
item in the budget to support the cost of one full-time equivalent employee at the department of
elementary and secondary education to aid in the administration and implementation of this
program.
(j) For the first year of implementation, schools designated as eligible for the CEP in
Kindergarten through grade five (K-5) are authorized to participate in the CEP program. However,
schools that serve additional grades including, but not limited to, grades kindergarten through grade
eight (K-8), or grades five (5) and six (6), shall have the option to voluntarily elect to participate in
the CEP program.
(k) In instances where a school has grades beyond the specified eligible range, such as
grades six (6) through eight (8) in the case of a kindergarten through grade eight (K-8) schools, or
grade six (6) in the case of a grade five (5) and grade (6) school, the state shall cover the cost of
providing CEP benefits to the non-eligible grades in the first year of implementation, ensuring that
grade six through eight (6-8) in a kindergarten through grade eight (K-8) school or grade (6) in a
grade five and six (5-6) school are eligible for coverage at no cost to the school or district.
(l) All local education agencies (“LEAs”) and eligible schools are hereby required to
participate in the federal CEP program if they meet the criteria for eligibility, as defined by federal
law. The state shall provide the necessary funding to cover the LEA's share of the program costs to
ensure full participation.
(m) LEAs and schools that meet the eligibility requirements shall participate fully in the
CEP, and it is the responsibility of the LEA to maximize the use of available federal funds under
the CEP. Failure to participate in the CEP program without a valid exemption will result in the
forfeiture of state funding intended to support CEP-related costs.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
========
LC001591
========
LC001591 - Page 4 of 5